Georgia, session 2025_26, HB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Investing in Every Student Act."
SECTION 2.
Part 5 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to program weights and funding requirements under the "Quality Basic Education
H. B. 27
- 1 -

LC 61 0028
Act," is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-189, relating to migrant student grants for
schools, as follows:
"20-2-189.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Foster care student' means a student enrolled in a public school in this state who is
placed in a foster family home, child care institution, or another substitute care setting
approved by the Department of Human Services.
(2) 'Homeless student' means a student enrolled in a public school in this state who meets
the definition of the term 'homeless children and youths' under the federal
McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, codified at 42 U.S.C. Section 11301, et seq.,
in force and effect on January 1, 2025.
(3) 'Migrant student' means 'migrant student' means a child who is a student enrolled in
a public school in this state and who has, within 12 months prior to first becoming a
student in such school, moved across state, or school district system, or school attendance
zone lines with a migrant parent or guardian to enable the child, the child's parent or
guardian, or a member of the child's immediate family to obtain temporary or seasonal
employment in an agricultural or fishing activity.
(4) 'Student living in poverty' means a student enrolled in a public school in this state
who meets one or more of the following criteria:
(A) Lives in a family unit directly certified to be receiving Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits;
(B) Lives in a family unit directly certified to be receiving Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families (TANF) benefits;
(C) Is a homeless student;
(D) Is a foster care student; or
(E) Is a migrant student.
H. B. 27
- 2 -

LC 61 0028
(b) The State Board of Education shall provide grants to qualified local units of
administration for the purpose of supplementing services and instruction to currently
enrolled migrant students living in poverty, subject to appropriation by the General
Assembly. Such grants shall be provided beyond those funds to which local units of
administration otherwise are entitled by the provisions of this article and other statutes.
The State Department Board of Education by regulation shall establish rules and
regulations relating to the manner in which a local unit of administration must demonstrate
that any of its schools meets the eligibility requirements of this subsection it is eligible to
receive a grant under this Code section.
(c) Grants under this Code section shall be subject to appropriation by the General
Assembly. The Department of Education shall calculate the grant amount for a each local
unit of administration to be used for a school thereof under this Code section shall be
determined by multiplying the total appropriation for such grants by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the average number of eligible migrant students enrolling in that
school after the final FTE count as required in subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-160 but
prior to the end of the same academic year and the denominator of which is the average
total number of eligible migrant students enrolling after the final FTE count as required in
subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-160 but prior to the end of the same academic year in
all local units in the entire state number of students living in poverty enrolled in such local
unit of administration as of the date of the initial enrollment count each year as set forth in
Code Section 20-2-160 by an amount equal to 25 percent of the base amount calculated as
set forth in Code Section 20-2-161. At least 90 percent of the grant funds received by a
local unit under this Code section shall be used for direct program expenditures at the
school for the benefit of the students living in poverty for which the grant is computed
under this subsection Code section. Any portion of that 90 percent not so expended shall
be returned to the State Department Board of Education."
H. B. 27
- 3 -

LC 61 0028
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 27
- 4 -